Washington statutes.
RCW 10.21.055

Conditions of release—Requirements—Ignition interlock device—24/7 sobriety program monitoring—Notice by court, when—Release order.

(1)(a) When any person charged with a violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504, 46.61.520, or 46.61.522, in which the person has a prior offense as defined in RCW 46.61.5055 and the current offense involves alcohol, is released from custody at arraignment or trial on bail or personal recognizance, the court authorizing the release shall require, as a condition of release that person comply with one of the following four requirements:

(i) Have a functioning ignition interlock device installed on all motor vehicles operated by the person, with proof of installation filed with the court by the person or the certified interlock provider within five business days of the date of release from custody or as soon thereafter as determined by the court based on availability within the jurisdiction; or

(ii) Comply with 24/7 sobriety program monitoring, as defined in RCW 36.28A.330; or

(iii) Have an ignition interlock device on all motor vehicles operated by the person pursuant to (a)(i) of this subsection and submit to 24/7 sobriety program monitoring pursuant to (a)(ii) of this subsection, if available, or alcohol monitoring, at the expense of the person, as provided in RCW 46.61.5055(5) (b) and (c); or

(iv) Have an ignition interlock device on all motor vehicles operated by the person and that such person agrees not to operate any motor vehicle without an ignition interlock device as required by the court. Under this subsection (1)(a)(iv), the person must file a sworn statement with the court upon release at arraignment that states the person will not operate any motor vehicle without an ignition interlock device while the ignition interlock restriction is imposed by the court. Such person must also submit to 24/7 sobriety program monitoring pursuant to (a)(ii) of this subsection, if available, or alcohol monitoring, at the expense of the person, as provided in RCW 46.61.5055(5) (b) and (c).

(b) The court shall immediately notify the department of licensing when an ignition interlock restriction is imposed as a condition of release or after conviction in instances where a person is charged with, or convicted of, a violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504, 46.61.520, or 46.61.522. If the court imposes an ignition interlock restriction, the department of licensing shall attach or imprint a notation on the driving record of any person restricted under this section stating that the person may operate only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock device.

(2)(a) Upon acquittal or dismissal of all pending or current charges relating to a violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504, 46.61.520, or 46.61.522, or equivalent local ordinance, the court shall authorize removal of the ignition interlock device and lift any requirement to comply with electronic alcohol/drug monitoring imposed under subsection (1) of this section. Nothing in this section limits the authority of the court or department under RCW 46.20.720.

(b) If the court authorizes removal of an ignition interlock device imposed under this section, the court shall immediately notify the department of licensing regarding the lifting of the ignition interlock restriction and the department of licensing shall release any attachment, imprint, or notation on such person's driving record relating to the ignition interlock requirement imposed under this section.

(3) When an ignition interlock restriction imposed as a condition of release is canceled, the court shall provide a defendant with a written order confirming release of the restriction. The written order shall serve as proof of release of the restriction until which time the department of licensing updates the driving record.

[ 2020 c 330 s 3; 2016 c 203 s 16; 2015 2nd sp.s. c 3 s 2; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 35 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 330: See note following RCW 9.94A.729.

Finding—Intent—2015 2nd sp.s. c 3: "The legislature finds that impaired driving continues to be a significant cause of motor vehicle crashes and that additional measures need to be taken to identify people who are driving under the influence, provide appropriate sanctions, and ensure compliance with court-ordered restrictions. The legislature intends to increase the availability of forensic phlebotomists so that offenders can be appropriately and efficiently identified. The legislature further intends to require consecutive sentencing in certain cases to increase punishment and supervision of offenders. The legislature intends to clarify ignition interlock processes and requirements to ensure that those offenders ordered to have ignition interlock devices do not drive vehicles without the required devices." [ 2015 2nd sp.s. c 3 s 1.]